Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $12,300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign, right-of-way acquisition, design, engineering, and construction of capacity and safety improvements to the interchange at U.S. Highway 169 and Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 130 in Maple Grove. This appropriation does not require a nonstate match. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end